Alaska statutes. Title 37. Public Finance.
Article 10. Mine Reclamation Trust Fund.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 137, SLA 2004 (HB 486), amending provisions in this chapter relating to bonding and financial assurance, see 2004 House Journal 2606 - 2608.

Sec. 37.14.800.
Mine reclamation trust fund established.

The mine reclamation trust fund is established as a separate trust fund of the state. The principal and earnings of the fund shall be held by the state for the purpose of protecting the public interest in reclaiming mine sites in the state. The fund is composed of the mine reclamation trust fund income account and the mine reclamation trust fund operating account.

The mine reclamation trust fund income account consists of payments and deposits made by miners to satisfy the miners’ reclamation bonding or financial assurance obligation under AS

27.19.040

or AS

27.21.160

and earnings on the income account. The mine reclamation trust fund operating account consists of appropriations by the legislature of the annual balance of the mine reclamation trust fund income account and any earnings on those appropriations while in the operating account.

Before payments are accepted into the mine reclamation trust fund income account for a particular mining operation, the commissioner of natural resources and the miner may execute a memorandum of understanding that outlines a schedule of expected payments into the trust fund and the relationship of the payments and accumulated earnings in the trust fund to reclamation obligations of the miner under AS

27.19.040

or AS

27.21.160

. The memorandum of understanding may also address expected use of the fund under AS

37.14.820

. If the memorandum of understanding addresses investment of the fund with respect to payments made by the miner, the commissioner of revenue must also sign the memorandum.

Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund.

History.

(§ 8 ch 137 SLA 2004)

Sec. 37.14.810.
Powers and duties of the commissioner of revenue.

The commissioner of revenue is a fiduciary to the fund. The commissioner shall manage both the mine reclamation trust fund income account and the mine reclamation trust fund operating account and shall invest their assets in accordance with AS

37.10.071

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 137 SLA 2004)

Sec. 37.14.820.
Use of the mine reclamation trust fund operating account.

The commissioner of natural resources may make expenditures from the mine reclamation trust fund operating account for the following purposes:

reclamation of mining operations for which a payment or deposit has been made into the fund;

maintenance of dams and other permanent features related to a mining operation;

monitoring of site stability and water quality related to a mining operation;

control and treatment of acid rock drainage and other leachate related to a mining operation;

protection and treatment of surface water and groundwater related to a mining operation;

long-term site management of a mining operation;

refunds to miners of the deposits to the fund upon satisfactory completion of reclamation tasks as determined by the Department of Natural Resources.

Subject to appropriation, the mine reclamation trust fund operating account may be used to pay the expenses incurred by the commissioner of revenue in managing the fund and administrative expenses incurred by the Department of Natural Resources in administering the fund and programs under AS 27.19 and AS 27.21.

The Department of Natural Resources may not spend money deposited in the fund for one mining operation at another mining operation.

In accordance with AS

37.14.800(b)

, and except as provided in (b) of this section, earnings on the mine reclamation trust fund operating account are added to that account and are available for expenditure without further appropriation.

History.

(§ 8 ch 137 SLA 2004)

Sec. 37.14.830.
Regulations.

The commissioner of natural resources may adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

37.14.800

and

37.14.820

—

37.14.840

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 137 SLA 2004)

Sec. 37.14.840.
Definition.

Unless the context otherwise requires, in AS

37.14.800

—

37.14.840

, “fund” means the mine reclamation trust fund established in AS

37.14.800

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 137 SLA 2004)